Washington statutes.
RCW 19.110.075

Business opportunity fraud—Penalties.

(1) Any person who violates RCW 19.110.050 or 19.110.070 is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(2) Any person who knowingly violates RCW 19.110.050 or 19.110.070 is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) No indictment or information for a felony may be returned under this chapter more than five years after the alleged violation.

[ 2003 c 53 s 156.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.